Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.0885

Program placement—Outpatient—Prescriber access.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

An outpatient competency restoration program must include access to a prescriber.

[ 2023 c 453 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.